Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 260.407 is amended to read:
260.407. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, amounts received as con-
tributions by a candidate,  the principal campaign committee of a candidate or the principal cam-
paign committee of a holder of public office may be:
(A) Used to defray any expenses incurred in connection with the recipient’s  duties as a holder
of public office;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any  organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; [ or]
(D) Used for purposes of reasonable  security-related expenses, including security and
alarm systems and monitoring services for a candidate, holder  of public office or the family
of a candidate or holder of public office,  when the security-related expenses arise from the
candidate or holder of public office being a candidate or holder of public office; or
[(D)] (E) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions  by a candidate, the principal campaign committee of a
candidate for public office or the principal campaign committee of a holder  of public office may not
be:
(A) Except as provided in this subparagraph,  converted by any person to any personal  use
other than to defray any expenses incurred in connection with the  person’s duties as a holder of
public office or to repay to a candidate any loan  the proceeds of which were used in connection
with the candidate’s campaign[ ;]. Security and alarm systems obtained  for purposes of rea-
sonable security-related expenses under subsection (1)(a)(D) of  this section may be converted
to personal  use by the candidate or holder of public office after the candidate or holder of
public office is no longer a candidate or holder of public office.
(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any money award  as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil  penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS  183.310 or by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this paragraph  may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
a civil penalty imposed for  campaign finance violations by a provision of a county charter or ordi-
nance, a civil penalty imposed for campaign finance  violations by a city charter or ordinance, or a
Enrolled House Bill 4017 (HB 4017-INTRO) Page 1
civil penalty imposed by any charter or ordinance provision adopted under the authority of ORS
260.163, except that contributions  described in this subsection may not be used to pay a civil penalty
imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409 or an equivalent provision of a county or  city
charter or ordinance[ ;].
(C) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any legal  expenses incurred by the
candidate or public official in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding or investigation  that re-
lates to or arises from the  course and scope of the duties of the person as a candidate or public
official. Contributions described in this paragraph may be used to pay legal  expenses incurred by
the candidate or public official in connection with a legal proceeding brought under ORS  chapters
246 to 260, a campaign finance provision of  a county charter or ordinance, a campaign finance
provision of a city charter or ordinance, or  any charter or ordinance provision adopted under the
authority of ORS 260.163, except that contributions described in this subsection may  not be used to
pay legal expenses incurred in  connection with a proceeding brought under this section or ORS
260.409 or an equivalent provision of a county or city charter or ordinance[ ; or ].
(D) Used to make payments in connection with a nondisclosure agreement  relating to workplace
harassment. A nondisclosure agreement made in violation of this subparagraph is void and  may not
be enforced by a court of this state.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as contributions
by a political committee that is not a principal campaign committee may be:
(A) Used to repay to the political committee  any loan the proceeds of which were used in con-
nection with the campaign;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any  organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by the political committee may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use[ ;].
(B) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any money award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part  of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS 183.310 or by a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
a civil penalty imposed for campaign finance violations by a provision of a  county charter or ordi-
nance, a civil penalty imposed for campaign finance violations by  a city charter or ordinance, or a
civil penalty imposed by any charter or ordinance provision adopted under the authority of ORS
260.163, except that contributions  described in this subsection may not be used to pay a civil penalty
imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409 or an equivalent provision of a county or  city
charter or ordinance[ ;].
(C) Except as provided in this  subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by a
treasurer or director of  a political committee in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding or in-
vestigation that relates to or arises from  the course and scope of the duties of the person as a
treasurer or director. Contributions described  in this subsection may be used to pay legal expenses
incurred by a  treasurer or director in connection with a legal proceeding brought under ORS
chapters 246 to 260, a campaign finance provision of  a county charter or ordinance, a campaign fi-
nance provision of a city charter or ordinance, or any charter or ordinance provision  adopted under
the authority of ORS 260.163, except that contributions described in  this subsection may not be used
to pay legal expenses incurred in connection with a proceeding brought  under this section or ORS
260.409 or an equivalent provision of a county or city charter or ordinance[ ; or ].
(D) Used to make payments in connection with a nondisclosure agreement  relating to workplace
harassment. A nondisclosure agreement made in violation of this subparagraph is void and  may not
be enforced by a court of this state.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as contributions
by a chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee may be:
Enrolled House Bill 4017 (HB 4017-INTRO) Page 2
(A) Used to repay to the  chief petitioner any loan the proceeds of which were used in con-
nection with the initiative, referendum or recall petition;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any organization described in section 170(c) of the  Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by a  chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee
may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use[ ;].
(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any money award  as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil  penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS  183.310 or by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
a civil penalty imposed for  campaign finance violations by a provision of a county charter or ordi-
nance, a civil penalty imposed for campaign finance  violations by a city charter or ordinance, or a
civil penalty imposed by any charter or ordinance provision adopted under the authority of ORS
260.163, except that contributions  described in this subsection may not be used to pay a civil penalty
imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409 or an equivalent provision of a county or  city
charter or ordinance[ ;].
(C) Except as provided  in this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by a chief
petitioner or the treasurer  of a petition committee in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding
or investigation that relates to or arises from the course and scope of  the duties of the person as
a chief petitioner or treasurer.  Contributions described in this subsection may be used to pay legal
expenses incurred by a chief petitioner  or treasurer in connection with a legal proceeding brought
under ORS chapters 246 to 260, a campaign finance provision of  a county charter or ordinance, a
campaign finance provision of a city charter or  ordinance, or any charter or ordinance provision
adopted under the authority of ORS 260.163, except that contributions described in this subsection
may not be used to pay legal expenses  incurred in connection with a proceeding brought under this
section or ORS 260.409 or an equivalent provision of a county or city charter or ordinance[ ; or ].
(D) Used to make payments in connection with a nondisclosure agreement  relating to workplace
harassment. A nondisclosure agreement made in violation of this subparagraph is void and  may not
be enforced by a court of this state.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Contribution” and “expenditure” include a contribution or expenditure to or on  behalf of
an initiative, referendum or recall petition.
(b) “Funds donated” means all  funds, including but not limited to gifts, loans, advances, credits
or deposits of money that are  donated for the purpose of supporting the activities of a holder of
public office. “Funds donated” does not mean  funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly or
another similar public appropriating body or  personal funds of the office holder donated to an ac-
count containing only those personal funds.
(c) “Public office” does not include national or political party office.
(d) “Workplace harassment” means conduct  that constitutes discrimination prohibited by ORS
659A.030, including conduct that constitutes sexual assault as defined in ORS 181A.323.
(5) As used in subsection (1)(a)(D) of this section, “family” includes  the spouse and any
child, parent,  grandparent, brother, half-brother, sister or half-sister of the candidate or
holder of public office, and any spouse of the child, parent, grandparent, brother,  half-
brother, sister or half-sister. “Family” does not include any  family member described in this
subsection of the spouse of the candidate or holder of public office.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 244.020 is amended to read:
244.020. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Actual conflict of  interest” means any action or any decision or recommendation by a per-
son acting in  a capacity as a public official, the effect of which would be to the private pecuniary
Enrolled House Bill 4017 (HB 4017-INTRO) Page 3
benefit or detriment of the person or  a relative or member of the household of the person, or any
business with which the person or a  relative or member of the household of the person is associated,
unless the pecuniary benefit or detriment arises out of circumstances described in subsection  (13)
of this section.
(2) “Business” means any corporation, partnership, proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise,
association, organization, self-employed individual and any other legal entity operated  for economic
gain but excluding any income-producing not-for-profit corporation that is tax exempt  under section
501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code with  which a public official or a relative or member of the
household of the public official is associated only as a member or board director  or in a
nonremunerative capacity.
(3) “Business with which the person is associated” means:
(a) Any private business  or closely held corporation of which the person or a relative or member
of the household of the person is a director, officer, owner or employee,  or agent or any private
business or closely held corporation in  which the person or a relative or member of the household
of the person owns or has owned stock, another form of equity interest, stock options or debt  in-
struments worth $1,000 or more at any point in the preceding calendar year;
(b) Any publicly held corporation in which the person  or a relative or member of the household
of the person owns or has owned $100,000 or more in stock or another form of equity  interest, stock
options or debt instruments at any point in the preceding calendar year;
(c) Any publicly held corporation of which the person or a  relative or member of the household
of the person is a director or officer; or
(d) For public officials required to file a statement  of economic interest under ORS 244.050, any
business listed as a source of income as required under ORS 244.060 (3).
(4) “Candidate” means an individual  for whom a declaration of candidacy, nominating petition
or certificate of nomination to public office has been filed or whose  name is printed on a ballot or
is expected to be or has been presented, with the individual’s consent, for nomination  or election
to public office.
(5) “Development commission” means any  entity that has the authority to purchase, develop,
improve or lease land or the authority to operate or direct the use  of land. This authority must be
more than ministerial.
(6) “First Partner” means the spouse  or domestic partner of the Governor, or an individual who
primarily has a personal relationship with the Governor as determined by the Oregon  Government
Ethics Commission by rule.  “First Partner” encompasses any alternative title that the Governor may
publicly substitute for “First Partner,” including, but  not limited to, “First Lady,” “First Husband”
or “First Spouse.”
(7)(a) “Gift” means something of economic value given to a public official, a candidate or a rel-
ative or member of the household of the public official or candidate:
(A) Without  valuable consideration of equivalent value, including the full or partial forgiveness
of indebtedness, which is not  extended to others who are not public officials or candidates or the
relatives or members of the household of public officials or candidates  on the same terms and con-
ditions; or
(B) For valuable consideration less than that required from others who are not public officials
or candidates.
(b) “Gift” does not mean:
(A) Contributions as defined in ORS 260.005.
(B) Gifts from relatives or members of the household of the public official or candidate.
(C) An unsolicited  token or award of appreciation in the form of a plaque, trophy, desk item,
wall memento or similar item, with a resale value reasonably expected to be less than $25.
(D) Informational or program material, publications  or subscriptions related to the recipient’s
performance of official duties.
(E) Admission provided to or the cost of food or beverage consumed by a public official,  a rel-
ative of the public official accompanying the public official, a member of the household of  the public
Enrolled House Bill 4017 (HB 4017-INTRO) Page 4
official accompanying the public official or a  staff member of the public official accompanying the
public official, at a reception, meal or meeting held by an organization when the  public official re-
presents state government as defined in ORS 174.111, a local government  as defined in ORS 174.116
or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(F) Reasonable expenses paid by any unit of the federal government,  a state or local govern-
ment, a Native American tribe that is  recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a
state, a membership organization to which a public body as  defined in ORS 174.109 pays membership
dues or a not-for-profit corporation that is tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal  Re-
venue Code, for attendance at a  convention, fact-finding mission or trip, conference or other meeting
if the public  official is scheduled to deliver a speech, make a presentation, participate on a panel
or represent state government as defined in ORS  174.111, a local government as defined in ORS
174.116 or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(G) Contributions made to a legal expense trust fund established under ORS 244.209 for  the
benefit of the public official.
(H) Reasonable food, travel or lodging expenses provided to a public official,  a relative of the
public official accompanying the  public official, a member of the household of the public official
accompanying the public official or a staff  member of the public official accompanying the public
official, when the public official is representing state government  as defined in ORS 174.111, a local
government as defined in ORS 174.116 or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117:
(i) On an officially sanctioned trade-promotion or fact-finding mission; or
(ii) In officially designated negotiations, or economic development activities, where receipt  of
the expenses is approved in advance.
(I) Food or beverage consumed by a public official acting in an official capacity:
(i) In association with the review, approval, execution of documents or closing of a  borrowing,
investment or other financial transaction, including any  business agreement between state govern-
ment as defined in ORS 174.111,  a local government as defined in ORS 174.116 or a special govern-
ment body as defined in ORS 174.117 and a private entity  or public body as defined in ORS 174.109;
(ii) While  engaged in due diligence research or presentations by the office of the State Treasurer
related to an existing or proposed investment or borrowing; or
(iii) While engaged in a meeting of an advisory,  governance or policy-making body of a corpo-
ration, partnership or other entity in which the office of the State Treasurer has invested moneys.
(J) Waiver or discount of registration  expenses or materials provided to a public official or
candidate  at  a continuing education event that the public official or candidate may attend to satisfy
a professional licensing requirement.
(K) Expenses provided by one public official to another public official for  travel inside this state
to or from an event that bears a relationship  to the receiving public official’s office and at which
the official participates in an official capacity.
(L) Food or beverage consumed by a public official or candidate  at a reception where the food
or beverage is provided as an incidental part of the reception and no  cost is placed on the food or
beverage.
(M) Entertainment provided to a public official or candidate or a relative or  member of the
household of the public official or candidate that is incidental to the main purpose of another  event.
(N) Entertainment provided to a public official or a relative or member of the household  of the
public official  where the public official is acting in an official capacity while representing state
government as defined in ORS 174.111, a  local government as defined in ORS 174.116 or a special
government body as defined in ORS 174.117 for a ceremonial purpose.
(O) Anything of  economic value offered to or solicited or received by a public official or candi-
date, or a relative or member of the household of the public official or candidate:
(i) As part of the usual and customary practice of the person’s  private business, or the person’s
employment or position as a volunteer with a private business, corporation,  partnership,
proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, not-for-profit  corporation or
other legal entity operated for economic value; and
Enrolled House Bill 4017 (HB 4017-INTRO) Page 5
(ii) That bears no relationship to the public official’s or candidate’s holding of, or candidacy for,
the official position or public office.
(P) Reasonable expenses paid to a public  school employee for accompanying students on an ed-
ucational trip.
(Q) Security and alarm systems  obtained for purposes of reasonable security-related ex-
penses under ORS 260.407 (1)(a)(D) that  are converted to personal use in accordance with
ORS 260.407 (1)(b)(A).
(8) “Honorarium” means a payment or something of economic value  given to a public official in
exchange for services upon which custom or propriety prevents the setting of a  price. Services in-
clude, but are not limited to, speeches or other services rendered in connection with an event.
(9) “Income” means income of any nature derived from any source, including, but not limited to,
any salary, wage, advance, payment, dividend, interest, rent, honorarium,  return of capital,
forgiveness of indebtedness, or anything of economic value.
(10) “Legislative or administrative interest” means an economic interest, distinct from  that of
the general public, in:
(a) Any matter subject to the decision or vote of the public official acting in the public  official’s
capacity as a public official; or
(b) Any matter that would be subject to the decision or vote  of the candidate who, if elected,
would be acting in the capacity of a public official.
(11) “Member of the household” means any person who resides with the public  official or can-
didate.
(12) “Planning commission” means a county planning commission created under ORS chapter 215
or a city planning commission created under ORS chapter 227.
(13) “Potential conflict of interest” means any  action or any decision or recommendation by a
person acting in a capacity as a public official, the effect of which could  be to the private pecuniary
benefit or detriment of the person or a relative or member of the household  of the person, or a
business with which the person or  the relative or member of the household of the person is associ-
ated, unless the pecuniary benefit or detriment arises out of the following:
(a) An interest or membership in a particular  business, industry, occupation or other class re-
quired by law as a prerequisite to the holding by the person of the office or position.
(b) Any action in the person’s official capacity which would affect to  the same degree a class
consisting of all inhabitants of the state, or a smaller class consisting of  an industry, occupation or
other group including one of which or in which the person or a relative or  member of the household
of the person, or a business with which  the person or the relative or member of the household of
the person is associated, is a member or is engaged.
(c) Membership  in or membership on the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation that is
tax-exempt under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(14) “Public office” has the meaning given that term in ORS 260.005.
(15) “Public official” means the First Partner  and any person who, when an alleged violation
of this chapter  occurs, is serving the State of Oregon or any of its political subdivisions or any other
public body as defined  in ORS 174.109 as an elected official, appointed official, employee or agent,
irrespective of whether the person is compensated for the services.
(16) “Relative” means:
(a) The spouse, parent, stepparent, child, sibling, stepsibling, son-in-law or daughter-in-law  of the
public official or candidate;
(b) The parent, stepparent, child, sibling, stepsibling,  son-in-law or daughter-in-law of the spouse
of the public official or candidate;
(c) Any individual for whom the public official or candidate has a legal support obligation;
(d) Any individual for whom the public official provides benefits  arising from the public official’s
public employment or  from whom the public official receives benefits arising from that individual’s
employment; or
Enrolled House Bill 4017 (HB 4017-INTRO) Page 6
(e) Any individual from  whom the candidate receives benefits arising from that individual’s em-
ployment.
(17) “Statement of economic interest” means  a statement as described by ORS 244.060 or
244.070.
(18) “Zoning commission” means an entity to which is delegated  at least some of the discre-
tionary authority of a planning commission  or governing body relating to zoning and land use mat-
ters.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 17, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4017 (HB 4017-INTRO) Page 7